Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-134
Truck, defined.

Truck means any motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property or designated as a truck by the manufacturer.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 7.